California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------

14252.

The enumeration of any right or remedy herein shall not affect a registrant’s right to prosecute under any penal law of this state, including, but not limited to, Section 350 of the Penal Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14254.

(a) Actions to require cancellation of a mark registered pursuant to this chapter or in mandamus to compel registration of a mark pursuant to this chapter shall be brought in the superior court.

(b) In an action in mandamus, the proceeding shall be based solely upon the record before the secretary. In an action for cancellation, the secretary shall not be made a party to the proceeding, but shall be notified of the filing of the complaint by the clerk of the court in which it is filed and shall be given the right to intervene in the action.

(c) In any action brought against a nonresident registrant, service may be effected upon the secretary as agent for service of the registrant in accordance with the procedures established for service upon nonresident corporations and business entities under Sections 416.10 to 416.40, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure, and Sections 2110, 2111, and 2114 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14259.

Nothing herein shall adversely affect the rights or the enforcement of rights in marks acquired in good faith at any time within common law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Fees [14260. - 14260.]

14260.

Unless specified by the secretary, the fees payable herein are not refundable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Severability [14265. - 14265.]

14265.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this chapter shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Miscellaneous  [14270. - 14272.]

14270.

This chapter shall not affect any suit, proceeding, or appeal pending on January 1, 2008.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14272.

The intent of this chapter is to provide a system of state trademark registration and protection substantially consistent with the federal system of trademark registration and protection under the Trademark Act of 1946 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1051 et seq.), as amended. To that end, the construction given the federal act should be examined as nonbinding authority for interpreting and construing this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Trade Names and Designations [14401. - 14495.]



  ARTICLE 1. Trade Names [14401. - 14405.]

14401.

Any trade name may be transferred in the same manner as personal property in connection with the good will of the business in which it is used or the part thereof to which it is appurtenant, and the owner is entitled to the same protection by suits at law or in equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14402.

Any court of competent jurisdiction may restrain, by injunction, any use of trade names in violation of the rights defined in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14403.

Every person who has in his possession, or who uses any cask, bottle, vessel, case, cover, label, brand, or other thing bearing, or having in any way connected with it, the trade name of another, for the purpose of disposing of any article other than that which such cask, bottle, vessel, case, cover, label, brand or other thing, originally contained, or is connected with by the owner of the trade name, with intent to deceive or defraud, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14404.

Every person who wilfully defaces, obliterates, or otherwise removes, destroys, or conceals the trade name of another, printed, branded, stamped, engraved, etched, blown, impressed, or otherwise attached to, or produced upon any cask, keg, bottle, vessel, siphon, can, case, or other package, for the purpose of selling or trafficking in such cask, keg, bottle, vessel, siphon, can, case, or other package, or refilling such cask, keg, bottle, vessel, siphon, can, case, or other package, with intent to defraud the owner thereof, without the consent of the owner, or unless the same has been purchased from the owner, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14405.

Every person who wilfully sells, or traffics in any cask, keg, bottle, vessel, siphon, can, case or other package bearing the trade name of another, printed, branded, stamped, engraved, etched, blown, or otherwise attached or produced thereon, or refills any such cask, keg, bottle, vessel, siphon, can, case, or other package with intent to defraud the owner thereof, without the consent of the owner, or unless it has been purchased from the owner, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Trade Name Registration [14411. - 14418.]

14411.

The filing of any fictitious business name statement by a person required to file such statement pursuant to Section 17910 shall establish a rebuttable presumption that the registrant has the exclusive right to use as a trade name the fictitious business name, as well as any confusingly similar trade name, in the county in which the statement is filed, if the registrant is the first to file such a statement containing the fictitious business name in that county, and is actually engaged in a trade or business utilizing such fictitious business name or a confusingly similar name in that county.

The rebuttable presumption created by this section shall be one affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

14412.

The rebuttable presumption created by Section 14411 shall be applicable until the fictitious business name statement is abandoned pursuant to Section 17922, or otherwise expires pursuant to Section 17920, and no new fictitious business name statement has been filed by the registrant, or in the case of any assignment or transfer no original fictitious business name statement has been filed by the assignee or transferee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

14413.

For purposes of Section 14411 a fictitious business name statement filed after January 1, 1971, and deemed filed on July 1, 1971, under Section 8 of Chapter 618 of the 1970 Statutes shall be considered filed at the time a certificate was first filed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2466) of Title 10 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, as it existed on the effective date of the filing, provided that the certificate had not expired prior to the filing under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

14414.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require or prohibit the filing in any county of any fictitious business name statement if such filing is not required or prohibited by Section 17910.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

14415.

The filing of articles of incorporation pursuant to Section 200 of the Corporations Code, in the case of a domestic corporation, or the obtaining of a certificate of qualification pursuant to Sections 2105 and 2106 of the Corporations Code, in the case of a foreign corporation, shall establish a rebuttable presumption that the corporation has the exclusive right to use as a trade name, in the state the corporate name set forth in the articles or certificate, as well as any confusingly similar trade name, if the corporation is the first to have filed the articles or obtained the certificate containing the corporate name, and is actually engaged in a trade or business utilizing that corporate name or a confusingly similar name.

If a foreign corporation continues to have authority to transact intrastate business pursuant to Section 2102 of the Corporations Code, the foreign corporation shall be considered to have obtained its certificate of qualification pursuant to law for the purposes of this section on the date it first qualified to transact intrastate business in this state.

The rebuttable presumption created by this section affects the burden of producing evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

14416.

If, as to the same or a confusingly similar trade name, in a county, there are both a corporation entitled to the rebuttable presumption created by Section 14415 and a registrant entitled to the benefit of the presumption created by Section 14411, whichever has filed the fictitious business name statement, filed the articles of incorporation, or obtained the certificate of qualification first in time, and is actually engaged in a trade or business utilizing such fictitious business name, such corporate name, or a confusingly similar name, shall be entitled to the presumption as against the other, that he has the exclusive right to use such fictitious business name, or such corporate name, or a confusingly similar name, as a trade name in the county where the registrant has filed his fictitious business name statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

14417.

The filing of articles of incorporation pursuant to Section 200 of the Corporations Code shall not of itself authorize the use in this state of a corporate name in violation of the rights of another under the federal Trademark Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1051 et seq.), the Trademark Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14200) of Division 6), the Fictitious Business Name Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Division 7), or the common law, including rights in a trade name. The Secretary of State shall deliver a notice to this effect to each newly organized corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1317, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14418.

The filing of any fictitious business name statement pursuant to Section 17910 does not, of itself, authorize the use in this state of a fictitious business name in violation of the rights of another as established under this chapter, the federal law relating to trademarks (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1051 et seq.), or the common law, including rights in a trade name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Container Brands [14425. - 14438.]

14425.

As used in this article:

(a) “Containers,” “equipment” and “supplies” means containers, equipment or supplies bearing a brand.

(b) “Brand” means any mark, name or device filed as a brand under this article.

(c) “Registrant” means a person who files a brand under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14426.

Any corporation or association whose members might register a brand under this article, may itself register a brand under this article.

As used in this article, “member of a registrant” means a member who would be entitled to register the same brand under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14427.

Any person, who is engaged in the manufacture, packing, canning, bottling, or selling of any substance in containers with his or her name, or other mark or device impressed or produced thereon, or whose equipment or supplies, owned by and used in his or her business, bears a name or other mark or device impressed or produced thereon, may file in the office of the Secretary of State after payment of the fee set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 12193 of the Government Code, a description of the name, mark, or device so used, as a brand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1000, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14429.

There shall be included as a part of each brand the words, “Registered in California,” or the abbreviation, “Reg. Cal.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14430.

It is unlawful for any person except a person named in subdivision (a) to do any of the acts named in subdivision (b).

(a) Persons excepted:

(1) The owner of the brand which has been filed in accordance with this article.

(2) The registrant.

(3) Members of any corporation or association which is the registrant.

(4) A person who has the written consent of the registrant describing the containers, equipment or supplies to which it applies.

(5) A person who has purchased the container, equipment or supplies from the owner of the brand appearing thereon.

(b) Prohibited acts:

(1) Possessing, using, or filling with any substance any container.

(2) Obliterating or concealing the brand on any container, supplies or equipment.

(3) Selling, buying, giving, taking or otherwise trafficking in any container, equipment, or supplies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 194, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14431.

The use by any person other than the registrant, or owner of the brand and other than the members of the registrant of any container, supplies or equipment, without the written consent provided for in this article, or the possession by any junk dealer, or dealer in secondhand articles, of any containers, supplies or equipment, is presumptive evidence of unlawful use of or traffic in such containers, supplies, or equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14432.

Any person acquiring containers, supplies or equipment, by purchase or other lawful means, and having the written consent provided for in this article is not required again to file the description, but acquires as a part of his or her purchase all benefit that the vendor has.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 194, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14433.

The acceptance by the owner, or any person lawfully entitled to their use, of any money as a deposit to secure the safekeeping and return of containers, equipment or supplies does not constitute a sale of the containers, supplies or equipment, either optional or otherwise, in any proceeding under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14434.

It is the duty of every person who finds or receives in the regular course of business or in any other manner, any containers, supplies or equipment to make diligent effort to find the owner and return the containers, supplies or equipment to him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14435.

(a) Whenever any registrant or any member of the registrant takes an oath before any magistrate that he has reason to believe, and does believe, that any of the containers, supplies or equipment mentioned in this article, are being unlawfully sold, filled or used, or are secreted in any place, the magistrate shall issue a search warrant to discover and obtain them;

(b) The magistrate may cause to be brought before him, the person in whose possession the containers, equipment or supplies are found, and if he finds that the person has been guilty of a violation of this article, he shall impose the punishment prescribed in this article, and also award the possession of the containers, equipment or supplies taken upon the search warrant to the owner, or to the corporation or association of which the owner is a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14436.

The violation of any of the provisions of this article is a misdemeanor, punishable:

(a) For the first offense by imprisonment for not less than 10 days nor more than six months or by a fine of fifty dollars ($50) for each and every container, or article of supply or equipment so filled, sold, used, disposed of, held, bought or trafficked in, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(b) For each subsequent offense by imprisonment for not less than 20 days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every container, or article of supply or equipment so filled, sold, used, disposed of, held, bought or trafficked in, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 194, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

14437.

Every brand registered and published under Chapter 431 of the Statutes of 1921, as amended, prior to the effective date of Chapter 1162 of the Statutes of 1931, and all containers, equipment and supplies bearing such a brand shall be entitled to all the protection and benefits of this chapter, and it is not necessary for any such brand to be changed or reregistered on account of the provisions of Chapter 1162 of the Statutes of 1931 and the provisions of this article which constitute a restatement and continuation thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 194, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

14438.

Any registrant whose containers, equipment or supplies are involved in any violation of the provisions of this article may sue the person or persons who violated said provisions and, upon proof of such violation, shall recover threefold the replacement cost new of the containers, equipment or supplies so involved and costs of suit including a reasonable attorney’s fee. No action shall be brought under this section or Section 14436 against a person who obtained possession of the containers, equipment or supplies pursuant to a contract with the registrant for the delivery of agricultural commodities, unless such person has failed to return to the registrant such containers, equipment and supplies to the point of delivery within 10 days after receipt of a demand for such return sent by registered mail to such person by the registrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 194, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Farm Names [14460. - 14465.]

14460.

“Farm,” as used in this article, includes ranch, estate and villa.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14461.

Any farm owner or lessee in this state may register the name of his or her farm with the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate setting forth the name and location of the farm and the name of the owner upon payment of the fee as set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 12193 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1000, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14462.

Any person selling or marketing the products grown on a farm may use the name of the farm as a trade-mark on the products of the farm, in the same manner as provided for other trade-marks, and subject to the same rights and duties, as provided in this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14463.

Registration under this article shall have the same effect as the registration of a trade-mark.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14464.

When any name has been registered as the name of any farm, that name shall not be registered as the name of any other farm in this State, unless designating words have been prefixed or added thereto. The Secretary of State shall register such name only for the person entitled thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14465.

Any person who registers as his own, any name already in use in this State, knowing that the name is already adopted as the name of a farm, or makes use of the name when regularly registered and in use by any other person entitled thereto under this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Laundry Supply Designations [14480. - 14491.]

14480.

As used in this article:

(a) “Registrant” means any person who files and publishes a name, mark or device under this article.

(b) “Supplies” means supplies bearing a name, mark or device filed and published under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14481.

Any person engaged in the business of supplying clean laundered garments, towels, table linen or other articles, the property of the supplier, in a regular service, periodically exchanging clean articles for soiled for a fixed compensation, may adopt and use a name or other mark or device woven, impressed or produced thereon as an indicium of ownership, and may register the name, mark or device by filing and publishing it under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14482.

In order to register a name, mark or device under this article, the supplier shall do all of the following:

(a) File in the office of the Secretary of State a description of the names, marks, or devices so used.

(b) Cause the description of the name, mark or device to be printed once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper published in the county in which the principal place of business of the supplier is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14483.

The registrant shall pay to the Secretary of State for filing each laundry supply designation described and for issuing a certificate of filing a fee as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 12193 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 506, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14484.

It is unlawful for any persons except a person named in subdivision (a) to do any of the acts named in subdivision (b):

(a) Persons excepted:

(1) The registrant.

(2) A person who has the written consent of the registrant.

(3) A person who has purchased the supplies from the registrant.

(b) Prohibited acts:

(1) Selling, buying, renting, giving, taking or otherwise trafficking in any supplies bearing a name, mark or device filed and published under this article. 

(2) Obliterating or otherwise covering up, concealing or removing a name, mark or device filed and published under this article, from such supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14485.

The acceptance by the registrant of any sum of money as a deposit to secure the safekeeping and return of the supplies does not constitute a sale of the supplies either optional or otherwise, in any proceeding under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14486.

The use by any person, other than the registrant of any supplies without the written consent provided in this article or the possession of supplies so marked by any junk dealer or dealer of secondhand articles is presumptive evidence of unlawful use of or traffic in such supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14487.

Any person or any member of any firm, corporation or association acquiring supplies by purchase or other lawful means and having the written consent provided for in this article, is not required again to file and publish the description but shall, as to supplies described in the written consent, acquire as part of the purchase all such rights and benefits as the vendor has under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14488.

It is the duty of every person who finds or receives in the regular course of business or in any other manner, any supplies to make diligent effort to find the owner and restore or return the supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14489.

Whenever the registrant or any member of any corporation or association which is the registrant takes an oath before any magistrate that he has reason to believe and does believe that any supplies are being unlawfully used, sold or secreted in any place, the magistrate shall issue a search warrant to discover and obtain the supplies and may also bring before him the person in whose possession the articles are found.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14490.

If the magistrate finds that any person brought before him has been guilty of a violation of this article he shall impose the punishment prescribed in this article and also award the possession of the property taken upon the search warrant to the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

14491.

The violation of any of the provisions of this article is a misdemeanor, except that if the violation consists of unlawfully using, selling, or secreting in any place supplies of a value exceeding nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), the violation is a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 1.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Names Other Than Trade Names [14492. - 14495.]

14492.

As used in this article, the following terms have the meanings set forth in this section unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Organization” includes any lodge, order, beneficial association, fraternal or beneficial society or association, historical, military, or veterans organization, labor union, or any other similar society, organization, or association or degree, branch, subordinate lodge, or auxiliary thereof.

(b) “Name and Ownership.” Name is that name that has first been adopted and used by an organization within or beyond the limits of this state, which name has been registered in the Office of the Secretary of State, and the name of any organization that has complied with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Part 3 of Division 7, unless the name conflicts with a name duly registered in the Office of the Secretary of State prior to the compliance with those provisions, and any organization that has so first adopted and used the name is its original owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14493.

Any court of competent jurisdiction may restrain by injunction: the use of the name of any organization in a commercial venture, trade or business, or in the solicitation of subscriptions for or sale of any newspaper, book, or other publication, or in the solicitation of advertising in any newspaper, book, or other publication or in the solicitation of, donations, aid, or other benefits by any other person, firm, or corporation representing directly or indirectly that such commercial venture, trade or business, newspaper or book or other publication or donation or solicitation for donation, is sponsored, endorsed or being offered by the organization owning such name, unless the person, firm, or corporation so using the name is entitled to use the name under the constitution, by-laws or rules of the organization owning such name, or by the written consent of such organization so owning the name to such use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1931.)
-------------------------------------------

14494.

In any action under Section 14493 it is not necessary to allege or prove actual damages or the threat thereof or actual injury or the threat thereof, to the plaintiff, but in addition to injunctive relief, any plaintiff in any such action is entitled to recover the amount of the actual damages, if any, sustained by such plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1931.)
-------------------------------------------

14495.

The use of the name of any organization by any person, firm, or corporation not entitled to use the same under the constitution, by-laws, rules or regulations of the organization which owns the name or by the written consent of such organization, is presumptive evidence of the unlawful use or traffic in such name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1931.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Solicitations for Financial Services [14700. - 14704.]

14700.

(a) “Lender” as used in this chapter means a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, credit union, industrial bank, or other lender licensed to make loans in California or a subsidiary or an affiliate of one of those entities.

(b) “Financial services” as used in this chapter means financial services or products that are considered to be financial in nature as described in Section 1843(k) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14701.

(a) No person shall include the name, trade name, logo, or tagline of a lender in a written solicitation for financial services directed to a consumer who has obtained a loan from the lender without the consent of the lender, unless the solicitation clearly and conspicuously states that the person is not sponsored by or affiliated with the lender and that the solicitation is not authorized by the lender, which shall be identified by name. This statement shall be made in close proximity to, and in the same or larger font size as, the first and the most prominent use or uses of the name, trade name, logo, or tagline in the solicitation, including on an envelope or through an envelope window containing the solicitation.

(b) No person shall use the name of a lender or a name similar to that of a lender in a solicitation for financial services directed to consumers if that use could cause a reasonable person to be confused, mistaken, or deceived initially or otherwise as to either of the following:

(1) The lender’s sponsorship, affiliation, connection, or association with the person using the name.

(2) The lender’s approval or endorsement of the person using the name or the person’s services or products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14702.

No person shall include a consumer’s loan number or loan amount, whether or not publicly available, in a solicitation for services or products without the consent of the consumer, unless the solicitation clearly and conspicuously states, when applicable, that the person is not sponsored by or affiliated with the lender and that the solicitation is not authorized by the lender, and states that the consumer’s loan information was not provided to that person by that lender. This statement shall be made in close proximity to, and in the same or larger font as, the first and the most prominent use or uses of the consumer’s loan information in the solicitation, including on an envelope or through an envelope window containing the solicitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14703.

It is not a violation of this chapter for a person in an advertisement or solicitation for services or products to use the name, trade name, logo, or tagline of a lender without the statement described in subdivision (a) of Section 14701 if that use is exclusively part of a comparison of like services or products in which the person clearly and conspicuously identifies itself or that otherwise constitutes nominative fair use. Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed or interpreted to alter or modify the trade name and trademark laws of this state, including Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14200) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14400).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14704.

(a) A person who violates Section 14701 or 14702 shall be subject to an injunction against that use. In an action to enjoin a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 14701 or Section 14702, it is not necessary to allege or to prove actual damage to the plaintiff, and irreparable harm and interim harm to the plaintiff shall be presumed. In the action to enjoin a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 14701, affidavits that show consumers were confused, mistaken, or deceived as to a matter described in subdivision (b) of Section 14701 is prima facie evidence of damage and injury to the plaintiff. In addition to injunctive relief, the plaintiff is entitled to recover in the action the amount of the actual damages, if any, it sustained.

(b) The prevailing party in an action brought under this chapter is entitled to recover its costs and reasonable attorney’s fees as the court may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. GENERAL BUSINESS REGULATIONS [16000. - 18107.]



PART 1. LICENSING FOR REVENUE AND REGULATION [16000. - 16550.2.]



  CHAPTER 1. Licensing by Cities [16000. - 16005.]

16000.

(a) The legislative body of an incorporated city may, in the exercise of its police power, and for the purpose of regulation, as herein provided, and not otherwise, license any kind of business not prohibited by law transacted and carried on within the limits of its jurisdiction, including all shows, exhibitions and lawful games, and may fix the rates of the license fee and provide for its collection by suit or otherwise. Any legislative body, including the legislative body of a charter city, that fixes the rate of license fees pursuant to this subdivision upon a business operating both within and outside the legislative body’s taxing jurisdiction, shall levy the license fee so that the measure of the fee fairly reflects that proportion of the activity actually carried on within the taxing jurisdiction.

(b) No license fee levied pursuant to subdivision (a) that is measured by the licensee’s income or gross receipts, whether levied by a charter or general law city, shall apply to any nonprofit organization that is exempted from taxes by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 23701) of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or Subchapter F (commencing with Section 501) of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or the successor of either, or to any minister, clergyman, Christian Science practitioner, rabbi, or priest of any religious organization that has been granted an exemption from federal income tax by the United States Commissioner of Internal Revenue as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or a successor to that section.

(c) Before a city, including a charter city, issues a business license to a person to conduct business as a contractor, as defined in Section 7026, the city shall verify that the person is licensed by the Contractors’ State License Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 936, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.1.

(a) (1) A city that licenses businesses carried on within its jurisdiction shall accept a California driver’s license or identification number, an individual taxpayer identification number, or a municipal identification number in lieu of a social security number if the city otherwise requires a social security number for the issuance of a business license.

(2) A city that licenses a business carried on within its jurisdiction shall require the applicant to provide an address where the individual consents to receive service of process. An acceptable address for this purpose shall include a post office box or private mailbox that complies with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 17538.5. This address shall be
 available for public inspection.

(3) Personal information collected for purposes of issuing a business license by a city shall be confidential, shall not be available to the public for inspection, and shall not be disclosed except as required to administer the licensure program or comply with a judicial warrant, subpoena, or court order.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

 (1) “City” includes a charter city and a city and county.

(2) “Personal information” means all of the following:

(A) An applicant’s residential address if the applicant provides a different address pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(B) A California driver’s license or identification number, an individual taxpayer identification number, a municipal identification number, and a social security number. 

(C) Income and tax information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 388, Sec. 2.   (AB 2184)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.2.

A city, county, or city and county that issues business licenses, equivalent instruments, or permits within its jurisdiction shall provide written notice of the requirements of Section 118600 of the Health and Safety Code to each applicant for a new or renewed business
 license, equivalent instrument, or permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (AB 783)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.3.

(a) When applying to a city for an initial business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, or renewal thereof, a person who conducts a business operation that is a regulated industry, as defined in Section 13383.5 of the Water Code, shall demonstrate enrollment with the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit program by providing all of the following information, under penalty of perjury, on the initial business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, or renewal thereof, application:

(1) The name and location of facilities operated by the person who conducts that business.

(2) All primary
 Standard Industrial Classification Codes, as defined in Section 25244.14 of the Health and Safety Code, for the business.

(3) Any of the following for each facility operated by the person of that business:

(A) The stormwater permit number, known as the Waste Discharger Identification number (WDID), issued for the facility by the State Water Resources Control Board.

(B) The WDID application number issued for the facility by the State Water Resources Control Board.

(C) The “notice of nonapplicability” (NONA) identification number issued for the facility by the State Water Resources Control Board.
